Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.220

Department of enterprise services to procure health benefit programs—Other governmental entities may use services.

Any governmental entity other than state agencies , may use the services of the department of enterprise services upon the approval of the director , in procuring health benefit programs as provided by RCW 41.04.180, 28A.400.350 and 28B.10.660: PROVIDED, That the department of enterprise services may charge for the administrative cost incurred in the procuring of such services.

[ 2015 c 225 s 52; 1983 c 3 s 88; 1969 ex.s. c 237 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1969 ex.s. c 237: See note following RCW 41.04.180.